Maine, session 132, LD1152.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §4318-A, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 232, §8, is
amended to read:
Beginning January 1, 2019, a A carrier offering a health plan in this State shall
establish, at a minimum, for all small group health plans as defined in section 2808‑B,
subsection 1, paragraph G compatible with a health savings account authorized under
federal law, a health plan design in which enrollees are directly incentivized to shop for
low-cost, high-quality participating providers for comparable health care services.
Incentives may include, but are not limited to, cash payments, gift cards or credits or
reductions of premiums, copayments or deductibles. A small group health plan design
created under this section must remain available to enrollees for at least 2 consecutive
years, except that any changes made to the program after 2 years, including, but not limited
to, ending the incentive, may not be construed as a change to the small group health plan
design for the purpose of guaranteed renewability under section 2808‑B, subsection 4 or
section 2850‑B. Incentives must be equal to or greater than 25% of the difference between
the price of the health care service from the provider selected and the statewide average for
the same covered health care service based on data reported on the publicly accessible
health care costs website of the Maine Health Data Organization. A carrier may use the
average price paid to a network provider for the covered comparable health care service
under the enrollee’s health plan in lieu of the statewide average price on the Maine Health
Data Organization’s publicly accessible health care costs website as long as the carrier uses
a reasonable method to calculate the average price paid. A multiple-employer welfare
arrangement is not considered a carrier for the purposes of this section.
Sec. 2. 24-A MRSA §4318-A, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 232, §8, is
amended to read:
A. "Comparable health care service" means nonemergency, outpatient health care
services in the following categories:
(1) Physical and occupational therapy services;
(2) Radiology and imaging services;
(3) Laboratory services; and
(4) Infusion therapy services.; and
(5) Surgical procedures.
Sec. 3. 24-A MRSA §4318-B, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 232, §9, is
amended to read:
1. Services from out-of-network provider; lower prices. Beginning January 1,
2019, if If an enrollee covered under a health plan other than a health maintenance
organization plan elects to obtain a covered comparable health care service as defined in
section 4318‑A, subsection 1, paragraph A from an out-of-network provider at a price that
is the same or less than the statewide average for the same covered health care service based
on data reported on the publicly accessible health care costs website of the Maine Health
Data Organization, the carrier shall allow the enrollee to obtain the service from the out-
of-network provider at the provider's charge and, upon request by the enrollee, shall apply
the payments made by the enrollee for that comparable health care service toward the
Page 1 - 132LR0700(01)

414 enrollee's deductible and out-of-pocket maximum as specified in the enrollee's health plan
425 as if the health care services had been provided by an in-network provider. A carrier may
436 use the average price paid to a network provider for the covered comparable health care
447 service under the enrollee's health plan in lieu of the statewide average price on the Maine
458 Health Data Organization's publicly accessible health care costs website as long as the
469 carrier uses a reasonable method to calculate the average price paid and the information is
570 available to enrollees through a website accessible to the enrollee and a toll-free telephone
581 number that provide, at a minimum, information relating to comparable health care
592 services. The enrollee is responsible for demonstrating to the carrier that payments made
1503 by the enrollee to the out-of-network provider should be applied toward the enrollee's
1514 deductible or out-of-pocket maximum pursuant to this section. The carrier shall provide a
1525 downloadable or interactive online form to the enrollee for the purpose of making such a
1536 demonstration and may require that copies of bills and proof of payment be submitted by
1547 the enrollee. For the purposes of this section, "out-of-network provider" means a provider
1558 located in Massachusetts, New Hampshire or this State that is enrolled in the MaineCare
1569 program and participates in Medicare.